West Virginia, session 2026, HB4609.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1C. BAIL. §62-1C-17d. Mental health evaluation prior to setting bail; purpose; report. Prior to setting bail, a magistrate or judge may order a defendant charged with §48-27-903 (violation of protective order); or §53-8-11 (violation of personal safety order); or §61-6-24 (threats of terroristic acts) to undergo a mental health evaluation performed by a mental health provider licensed by the state. The purpose of this evaluation is to determine if the defendant needs mental health treatment or counseling as a condition of bond. The evaluation must be scheduled within 10 days of the order's issuance. Once the evaluation is completed, the examiner must, within 48 hours, issue a report to the magistrate. A magistrate or judge shall hold a bond hearing within five days of receiving the report.